Nebraska, session 109, LB809.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB809 LB809
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 13-331, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
13-331 (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Local government means any city, village, or county or any
agency or subdivision of a city, village, or county; and
(b) Ordinance means any local law, including, but not limited to,
any ordinance, resolution, rule, or regulation.
(2) Except as expressly permitted by other state law, a local
government shall not have the power to enact or enforce any ordinance
that prohibits landlords from refusing to lease or rent a privately owned
single-family or multiple-unit residential or commercial rental property
to a person because the person's lawful source of income to pay rent
includes funding from a federal or other housing assistance program.
(3) (2) Except as expressly permitted by other state law or by
subsection (4) (3) of this section, a local government shall not have the
power to enact or enforce any ordinance which would have the effect of
imposing rent controls on private property.
(4) Subsection (3) of this (3) This section does not apply to an
ordinance that:
(a) Is adopted for the purposes of increasing the supply of
affordable housing and that does so through land-use or inclusionary
housing requirements; or
(b) Provides for a program that a private property owner voluntarily
and contractually agrees to participate in and that restricts rent and
rent increases.
(5) (4) This section applies notwithstanding the provisions of any
home rule charter.
(6) (5) Any ordinance in violation of this section is null and void.
Sec. 2. Original section 13-331, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025,
is repealed.
-2-